Utah statutes.
4-9-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Correct", when used in connection with weights and measures, means conformance to applicable requirements of this chapter.

(2)  "Package" means a commodity put up or packaged before sale in either wholesale or retail saleunits.

(3)  "Primary standards" mean the physical standards of the state, described in Section 4-9-4, which are the legal reference from which all other standards and weights and measures are derived.

(4)  "Sale from bulk" means the sale of commodities, when the quantity is determined at the time of sale.

(5)  "Secondary standards" means a physical standard which is traceable to primary standards through comparisons, using acceptable laboratory procedures.

(6)  "Weighing and measuring" means the use of weights and measures.

(7)  "Weight" means net weight, unless the label declares that the product is sold by drained weight, in which case, "weight" means net drained weight.

(8)  "Weights and measures" means weights and measures, and instruments or devices used for weighing or measuring, including an appliance or accessory associated with the instrument or device.

(9)  "Weights and measures registration" means the issuance of a certificate by the commissioner to a weights and measures user.

(10)  "Weights and measures user" means a person who uses weights and measures in trade or commerce.

